Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.545.090

Assessing nonhigh school lesser amount—Notice of.

Notwithstanding any provision of RCW 28A.545.050 through 28A.545.080 to the contrary, any high school district board of directors may elect to assess a nonhigh school district an amount which is less than that otherwise established by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.545.070 to be due. In the event a high school district elects to do so, it shall notify both the superintendent of public instruction and the nonhigh school district of its election and the lesser amount no later than September first following the school year for which the amount is due. In the absence of such notification, each nonhigh school district shall pay the amount otherwise established by the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.545.070.

[ 1990 c 33 s 493; 1981 c 264 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.44.210.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 264: See note following RCW 28A.545.030.